Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5639.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 11-26 of the General Laws entitled "Kidnapping" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
11-26-4. Attempted kidnapping of a minor.
(a) An attempt to commit the crime of kidnapping of a minor means doing any act toward
the commission of the offense of kidnapping of a minor, as set forth in § 11-26-1.4, but failing in
the perpetration of the offense of kidnapping of a minor.
(b) Whoever attempts to commit the crime of kidnapping of a minor, as set forth in § 11-
26-1.4, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for up to
twenty (20) years.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002191
========